Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2
STATE PARKS AND RECREATIONAL AREAS GENERALLY

Editor's notes.

- By resolution (Ga. L. 1987, p. 704), the General Assembly provided that the lodge and conference center to be constructed at Little Ocmulgee State Park in Wheeler County, Georgia be named and known as the "L.L. (Pete) Phillips Conference Center."

By resolution (Ga. L. 1988, p. 174), the General Assembly designated the state park on Lake Walter F. George in Clay County as the "George T. Bagby State Park."

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- State parks and historic sites, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-5-1 et seq.

12-3-30. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Land" means upland; land under water; the water of any lake, pond, or stream; any and all incorporeal hereditaments; and all rights, estates, interests, privileges, easements, encumbrances, and franchises, legal and equitable, in land or water, including terms for years, and by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise, and all claims for damages thereto.

"Park" or "recreational area" means any land which, by reason of natural features or scenic beauty, with or without historical, archeological, or scientific buildings or other objects thereon, possesses distinctive, innate or potential physical, intellectual, creative, social, or other recreational or educational value or interest.

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9.)

12-3-31. Parks and recreational areas acquired by state as constituting state park system; control and management of system by department.

All parks and recreational areas acquired by the state, whether before or after November 1, 1982, shall constitute the state park system and shall be under the immediate control and management of the department.

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9.)

12-3-32. Powers and duties of department as to parks and recreational areas and facilities.

The Department of Natural Resources is empowered and directed:

In cooperation with other state and local agencies and any agency of the United States government, to study and ascertain the state's present park, parkway, and recreational resources and facilities, the need for such resources and facilities, and the extent to which such needs are being currently met. The department shall also conduct a survey to identify land suitable and desirable for acquisition by the state as a part of the state park system, due consideration being given to scenic, recreational, historical, archeological, and other special features. The results of such study and survey shall be reported to the Governor and the next succeeding session of the General Assembly and shall be accompanied by such recommendations as the department shall deem advisable;

To acquire in the name of the state, by purchase, lease, agreement, or condemnation, such land within the state as it may deem necessary or proper for the extension of the state park system. The right of eminent domain shall be exercised in accordance with the provisions of law now or hereafter existing for the condemnation of property for public purposes, provided that no land or other property shall be taken or contracted to be taken unless or until the General Assembly has appropriated money therefor or funds have otherwise become available for such purpose;

To accept in its discretion, in fee or otherwise, land entrusted, donated, or devised to the state by the United States government, by a political subdivision of the state, or by any person, firm, association, or corporation, with the intent that the land shall become a part of the state park system. The department shall also in its discretion accept gifts, bequests, or contributions of money or other property to be used in extending, improving, or maintaining the state park system;

To make expenditures from available funds for the care, supervision, improvement, and development of the state park system;

To cooperate with other state agencies, with counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state, with other states, and with the United States government in matters relating to the acquiring, planning, establishing, developing, improving, or maintaining of any park, parkway, or recreational area;

To contract and make cooperative agreements with the United States government, with political subdivisions of the state, or with corporations, associations, or individuals, with proper bond where deemed advisable, to protect, restore, preserve, mark, maintain, or operate any historic, archeologic, or scientific site, ground, reservations, structure, building, object, or other property for public use, provided that no contract or cooperative agreement shall be made or entered into unless or until the General Assembly has appropriated money therefor or funds have otherwise become available for such purposes;

To enter into contracts and agreements for the construction, renovation, and repair of any improvements on any park or other property under its control for the purpose of providing suitable public service privileges, conveniences, and facilities and for improvements necessary for the operation and maintenance of such property; provided, however, that all such contracts shall be conducted and negotiated by the Department of Administrative Services in accordance with Code Section 50-5-72;

To provide and maintain adequate recreational facilities and to initiate, conduct, and supervise suitable programs and activities in connection therewith;

To grant concessions for the operation of public service privileges, conveniences, and facilities when the department determines in its discretion that such private concessions are in the best interest of the general public and the department. Such concessions may be granted to any responsible person, partnership, firm, association, or corporation for a period not to exceed five years and upon such terms as the department may deem advisable and consistent with other laws of this state;

To establish and, from time to time, to alter rules and regulations governing the use, occupancy, and protection of the land and property under its control and to preserve the peace therein. The department is empowered to confer on such employees as it may designate the full authority of peace officers for all land and property under its control;

To plan and conduct a program of information and publicity as to the scenic, recreational, historical, archeological, and scientific points and places within the state designed to attract tourists and visitors to this state;

To cooperate with the Department of Transportation in the establishment and maintenance of roadside parks and developments for the convenience and enjoyment of the traveling public; and

To purchase and provide uniforms to such of its officers, assistants, and employees as it deems advisable.

All of the functions of the former Department of State Parks are transferred to the Department of Natural Resources.

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9; Ga. L. 1943, p. 180, §§ 1, 3, 4, 7; Ga. L. 1951, p. 788, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 634, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1503; Ga. L. 1981, p. 980, §§ 1, 2, 6.)

Law reviews.

-
For note, "Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia," recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972).

12-3-33. County and municipal aid to state park system.

Any county, and any municipality therein, may use any available funds to aid in the purchase of any land or other property within the county which is to become the property of the state for incorporation into the state park system, provided that the department shall have first agreed in writing to the acceptance of the same. Any county, and any municipality therein, may contribute any available funds to or perform services for the department in furtherance of the improvement, maintenance, and operation of any state owned park or other property which is as of November 1, 1982, or may thereafter become a part of the state park system.

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9; Ga. L. 1959, p. 75, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, in the second sentence, "state owned" was substituted for "state-owned".

12-3-34. Permits for construction, maintenance, and use of boat docks and boat shelters on High Falls Lake.

The Department of Natural Resources is authorized to issue revocable permits for the construction, maintenance, and use of boat docks and boat shelters on High Falls Lake by the owners or lessees of private property abutting the high-water mark of such lake. Such permits shall constitute limited revocable licenses. Such permits shall be issued for periods of three years from the date of issuance and shall be transferable; provided, however, that in order to stagger the renewal periods, the department is authorized to issue permits of one- or two-year duration with the fee prorated appropriately. The fee for such permit for each three-year period shall be fixed by rule or regulation of the Board of Natural Resources in a reasonable amount not to exceed $75.00 for boat docks and $75.00 for boat shelters. The fees collected for such permits shall be miscellaneous funds for purposes of use by the Department of Natural Resources pursuant to Code Section 12-3-2.

No person shall construct or maintain a boat dock or boat shelter below the high-water mark of High Falls Lake without a valid permit from the Department of Natural Resources. It shall be the duty of the owner of any boat dock or boat shelter on High Falls Lake to keep such dock or shelter in good repair. All such boat docks and boat shelters shall conform to standards for construction, design, maintenance, and repair specified in rules and regulations of the department and restrictions or conditions in the permit. It shall be the duty of the owner of such boat dock or boat shelter to remove any such dock or shelter which is not in compliance with such rules and regulations or permit.

It shall be the duty of the owner of any boat dock or boat shelter or the holder of any permit issued under this Code section to notify the department when he or she sells or otherwise transfers the property for which the boat dock or boat shelter is permitted.

The department and any official or employee thereof is authorized to inspect any boat dock or boat shelter on High Falls Lake and to remove or cause to be removed any such dock or shelter for which a permit is not in effect or which violates the standards for construction, design, maintenance, and repair or the permit conditions imposed by the department.

The Board of Natural Resources is authorized to adopt rules and regulations necessary or convenient to carry out this Code section and is authorized to impose reasonable terms and conditions on the granting of permits and the construction of boat docks and boat shelters on High Falls Lake by the owners or lessees of private property abutting the high-water mark of such lake.

Any permit may be revoked by the department for any violation of this Code section, any rule or regulation of the Board of Natural Resources, or any condition contained in such permit.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-34

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 118, § 1/SB 99.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Permitting boat docks at High Falls State Park Lake, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-5-12.